Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Chapter 4 Metropolitan Airport Authorities
42-4-116. Taxation.

Whenever any airport in regard to which an authority has been created exists outside the territorial limits of the creating municipality, any vocation, occupation, business or business activity located upon the premises, grounds, and/or property of the airport shall be subject to be taxed by both any municipality or county in which the airport is actually located and by the creating municipality to the extent and in the manner provided by law.

This section does not apply to counties having a population of between two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) and two hundred ninety thousand (290,000), according to the 1980 federal census.

This section does not apply to any county having a population of:

not less than nor more than

100,000 200,000

450,000 550,000

600,001

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section does not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government.

This section does not apply to any municipality or county creating, controlling, or operating, in part, an airport or air navigation facility created, controlled, or operated, in part, by at least four (4) political subdivisions of this state and a political subdivision of an adjacent state, which airport is located outside the territorial limits of the municipality or county.

Acts 1983, ch. 466, §§ 2, 4-7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

42-4-117. Noise compatibility program — Noise abatement study.

Each metropolitan airport authority that has a major airline, air carrier, or air parcel hub operation that undertakes a noise compatibility program under part 150 of the federal air regulations, or any other study relating to noise abatement, shall be required to file a copy of the program or study with the departments of environment and conservation and transportation. All revisions or updates to the program or study also shall be filed with such departments as soon as practicable after their completion.

It is the expressed intent of the general assembly that this section be informational to ensure that such departments have access to full and complete data so that these departments are better able to assist and serve the citizens of Tennessee.

Acts 1987, ch. 426, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Part 150 of the federal air regulations, referred to in this section, is codified at 14 CFR §§ 150.1 et seq.